North Carolina, session 2025, HB1055.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Guilford Technical
Community College (GTCC) to support the expansion of the GTCC Aviation Center and for
capital expenses related to that expansion. Funds appropriated in this section shall not revert but
shall remain available until expended.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1055-v-1*